Delaware, session 153, HB167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 9906, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 9906. Family Justice Center Council [For application of this section, see 84 Del. Laws, c. 508, Â§ 2]. (c) The Council consists of the following members: (10) Ten Twelve at-large members who are selected by Council members under paragraphs (c)(1) through (c)(7) (c)(9) of this section. The Council members selecting the at-large members must consider geographic diversity and ensure representation of each county when selecting an at-large member. An at-large member is a full member of the Council. The at-large members must be comprised of the following: f. One member representing the health-care community including mental health providers and sexual assault nurse examiners. care provider community. k. One member representing the sexual assault nurse examiner or forensic nurse examiner community. l . One member representing system-based police or prosecution victim service specialists.